District of Columbia statutes.
34-2410.01

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term “private fire hydrant” means a hydrant which is not owned by the District of Columbia. The term “private fire hydrant” does not include any private water distribution system connecting the private fire hydrant to the public water system.

Mar. 31, 2011, D.C. Law 18-337, § 2, 58 DCR 609

Section 2 of D.C. Law 18-93 added a section to read as follows: “Sec. 2. Private fire hydrants. ”As of October 1, 2009, the Mayor and any other District official is prohibited from approving any permit or related plan that authorizes the installation of a private fire hydrant without an agreement, to be recorded in the land records of the Recorder of Deeds, establishing the person or entity responsible for the maintenance, repair, and replacement of the private fire hydrant in perpetuity.”

Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 18-93 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.

Section 2 of D.C. Law 18-278 added a section to read as follows: “Sec. 2. Private fire hydrants. ”As of October 1, 2009, the Mayor and any other District official is prohibited from approving any permit or related plan that authorizes the installation of a private fire hydrant without an agreement, to be recorded in the land records of the Recorder of Deeds, establishing the person or entity responsible for the maintenance, repair, and replacement of the private fire hydrant in perpetuity.”

Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 18-278 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2 of Private Fire Hydrant Responsibility Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-197, October 8, 2009, 56 DCR 8130).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2 of Private Fire Hydrant Responsibility Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-511, July 30, 2010, 57 DCR 7592).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2 of Private Fire Hydrant Responsibility Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-581, October 19, 2010, 57 DCR 10116).